Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.909

Transfer of working connections child care and seasonal child care programs from the department of social and health services.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services pertaining to the working connections child care and seasonal child care programs are transferred to the department of children, youth, and families. All references to the secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington mean the secretary or the department of children, youth, and families when referring to the working connections child care program and seasonal child care program functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred must be delivered to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred must be made available to the department of children, youth, and families. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred are assigned to the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred are, on July 1, 2019, transferred and credited to the department of children, youth, and families.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, duties, and working connections child care program and seasonal child care program functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and families. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of children, youth, and families to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of children, youth, and families. All existing contracts and obligations remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of children, youth, and families.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of social and health services does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2019.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) All classified employees of the department of social and health services assigned to the department of children, youth, and families under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of children, youth, and families must become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department of children, youth, and families and are considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

[ 2018 c 52 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 52: "This act takes effect July 1, 2019." [ 2018 c 52 s 7.]

Intent—Finding—2018 c 52: "(1) The legislature recognizes that child care subsidy programs include the working connections child care program and the seasonal child care program. Child care subsidy programs provide children with stable, nurturing, and enriching activities while parents are supported in stable employment that contributes to financial independence. The legislature acknowledges that the department of early learning develops subsidized child care policy and conducts quality assurance for provider payments and the department of social and health services is responsible for other aspects of service delivery. The legislature intends for these child care subsidy programs to be thoughtfully integrated into the department of children, youth, and families while maintaining a delivery system that continues to support families and providers with consistent, accurate, and effective services.

(2) The legislature finds that the department of children, youth, and families submitted a report according to section 103, chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. with recommendations for effectively transferring working connections child care eligibility into the department of children, youth, and families by July 1, 2019. The legislature intends for the transfer of all aspects of service delivery of child care subsidy programs from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families to follow the recommendations of that report." [ 2018 c 52 s 1.]